Illinois, session 104th, HB5246.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-160, 16-203, and 16-204 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-160)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-719)8    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 9    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 10on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 11participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 12fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 13system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 147, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 15of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 16self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 17participant of the retirement plan established under Section 1822-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 19elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 20writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 21under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 22to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 23a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section   HB5246- 2 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b17-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 2system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 3deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 4to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 5subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 6Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 7intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 8date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 9Section 1-103.1 of this Code.10    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 11noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 12implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 13for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 14(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 15under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 16Article.17    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 18member under Article 16 on or after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly if that person 20(i) is at least 50 years of age, (ii) does not have any service 21credit under Article 16 or any reciprocal retirement system or 22pension fund, and (iii) makes the election under subsection 23(b) of Section 16-204. 24    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 25member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 26implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161   HB5246- 3 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 2(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 3under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 4Article.5    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 6subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 7under Section 1-161. 8    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 9member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 10months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 11Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 12of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 13Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 14which he or she is a member or participant. 15    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 16provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 17salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 18calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 19participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 20years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 21service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 22the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 23(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 24person who first becomes a member or participant of any 25retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 26applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final   HB5246- 4 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1average salary" shall be substituted for the following:2        (1) (Blank).3        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 4    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 5    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 6    withdrawal". 7        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 8        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 9        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 10        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 11    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 12    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 13of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 14the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 15member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 16following for the purpose of determining the member's final 17average salary:18        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 19    paragraph of this subsection; or20        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 21    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 22    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 23    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 24    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 25    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 26    of service in which the total salary or earnings   HB5246- 5 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 2    of months (or years) of service in that period.3    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 4this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 5benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 6salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 7participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 8$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 9increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 10previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 11percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 12price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 13preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.14    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 15means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 16the United States Department of Labor that measures the 17average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 18all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 191982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 20adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 21of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 22boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 231 of each year. 24    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 25under this Code (including, without limitation, the 26calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the   HB5246- 6 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 2member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 3applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 4that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 5earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 6and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 7Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 8federal Social Security Act. 9    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 10wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 11limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 12Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 13of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 14amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 15reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 16services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 17any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 18annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 19    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 20result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 21contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 22or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 23disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 24January 1, 2024. 25    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 26annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age   HB5246- 7 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b167 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 2subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 3Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 4Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 5election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 6and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 7eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 8    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 9with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 10this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 11first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 12after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 13of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 14of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 15requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 16the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 17this Section. 18    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 19subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 20date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 21provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 22retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 23application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 2410 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 25requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 26whichever is applicable.   HB5246- 8 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 2is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 3service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 4member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 5member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 62022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 7(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 8credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 9that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 10service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 11member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 12member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 132022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 14(d-15) of this Section).15    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 16Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 17of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 18years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 19each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 20    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 21participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 22after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 23date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 24either:25        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 26    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section,   HB5246- 9 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 2    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 3    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 4    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 5    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 6    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 7        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 8    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 9    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 10    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 11    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 12    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 13    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 14    this Code (for service under Article 11). 15    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 16between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 17subject to this subsection who makes the required election 18shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 19subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 20election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 21deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 22    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 23participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 24prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 25either: 26        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age   HB5246- 10 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 2    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 3    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 4    contributions for service annuities specified in 5    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or6        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 7    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 8    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 9    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 10    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 11    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 12    12-150. 13    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 14between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 15this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 16bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 17who fails for any reason to make the required election within 18the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 19made the election under item (ii). 20    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 21be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 22either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 23respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 24Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 25first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 26after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i)   HB5246- 11 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 2effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 3service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 4who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 5(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 6this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 7date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 8calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 9increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 10index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 11each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 12retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 13in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 14September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 15decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 16    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 17changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 18applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 19active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 20of Public Act 102-263). 21    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 22changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 23applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 24active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 25Public Act 100-23). 26    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an   HB5246- 12 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 2participant who first became a member or participant on or 3after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 4retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 5date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 6participant who has not retired and who first became a member 7or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 8survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 9applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 1066 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 11child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 12amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 13survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 14January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 15annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 16retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 17occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 18the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 19one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 20less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 21ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 22is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the 23annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 24index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 25each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 26annuity shall not be increased.   HB5246- 13 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person is a 2fire fighter in the fire protection service of a department, a 3security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 4Department of Juvenile Justice, or a security employee of the 5Department of Innovation and Technology, as those terms are 6defined in subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 714-110. A person who meets the requirements of this Section is 8entitled to an annuity calculated under the provisions of 9Section 14-110, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement 10annuity, only if the person has withdrawn from service with 11not less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 12attained age 60, regardless of whether the attainment of age 1360 occurs while the person is still in service. 14    (g-5) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person 15is a State policeman, investigator for the Secretary of State, 16conservation police officer, investigator for the Department 17of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the 18Office of the Attorney General, Commerce Commission police 19officer, or arson investigator, as those terms are defined in 20subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person 21who meets the requirements of this Section is entitled to an 22annuity calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in 23lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the 24person has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years 25of eligible creditable service and has attained age 55, 26regardless of whether the attainment of age 55 occurs while   HB5246- 14 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1the person is still in service. 2    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 3of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 4on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 5or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 6member or participant under any other system or fund created 7by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 8those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 9this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 10person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 11system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 12termination of that employment, the person's retirement 13annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 14recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 15applicable Article of this Code.16    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 17system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 18January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 19retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 20contractual basis a position to provide services to a 21governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 22that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 23active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 24contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 25retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 26fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an   HB5246- 15 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 2contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 3accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 4such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 5required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 6contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 7retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 8be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 9    (i) (Blank). 10    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 11this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 12provisions of this Section shall control.13(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 14102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-719, eff. 155-6-22; 103-529, eff. 8-11-23.) 16    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-813)17    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 18    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 19on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 20participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 21fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 22system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 237, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 24of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 25self-managed plan established under this Code or to any   HB5246- 16 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1participant of the retirement plan established under Section 222-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 3elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 4writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 5under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 6to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 7a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 87-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 9system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 10deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 11to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 12subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 13Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 14intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 15date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 16Section 1-103.1 of this Code.17    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 18noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 19implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 20for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 21(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 22under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 23Article.24    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 25member under Article 16 on or after the effective date of this 26amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly if that person   HB5246- 17 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1(i) is at least 50 years of age, (ii) does not have any service 2credit under Article 16 or any reciprocal retirement system or 3pension fund, and (iii) makes the election under subsection 4(b) of Section 16-204. 5    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 6member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 7implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 8for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 9(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 10under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 11Article.12    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 13subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 14under Section 1-161. 15    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 16member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 17months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 18Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 19of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 20Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 21which he or she is a member or participant. 22    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 23provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 24salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 25calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 26participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive   HB5246- 18 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 2service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 3the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 4(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 5person who first becomes a member or participant of any 6retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 7applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 8average salary" shall be substituted for the following:9        (1) (Blank).10        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 11    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 12    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 13    withdrawal". 14        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 15        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 16        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 17        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 18    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 19    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 20of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 21the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 22member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 23following for the purpose of determining the member's final 24average salary:25        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 26    paragraph of this subsection; or  HB5246- 19 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 2    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 3    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 4    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 5    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 6    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 7    of service in which the total salary or earnings 8    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 9    of months (or years) of service in that period.10    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 11this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 12benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 13salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 14participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 15$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 16increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 17previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 18percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 19price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 20preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.21    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 22means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 23the United States Department of Labor that measures the 24average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 25all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 261982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual   HB5246- 20 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 2of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 3boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 41 of each year. 5    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 6under this Code (including, without limitation, the 7calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 8annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 9member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 10applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 11that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 12earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 13and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 14Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 15federal Social Security Act. 16    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 17wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 18limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 19Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 20of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 21amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 22reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 23services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 24any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 25annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 26    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise   HB5246- 21 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 2contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 3or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 4disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 5January 1, 2024. 6    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 7annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 867 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 9subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 10Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 11Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 12election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 13and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 14eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 15    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 16with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 17this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 18first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 19after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 20of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 21of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 22requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 23the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 24this Section. 25    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 26subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective   HB5246- 22 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 2provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 3retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 4application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 510 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 6requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 7whichever is applicable. 8    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 9is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 10service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 11member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 12member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 132022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 14(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 15credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 16that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 17service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 18member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 19member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 202022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 21(d-15) of this Section).22    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 23Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 24of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 25years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 26each full month that the member's age is under age 65.   HB5246- 23 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 2participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 3after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 4date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 5either:6        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 7    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 8    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 9    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 10    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 11    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 12    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 13    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 14        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 15    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 16    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 17    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 18    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 19    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 20    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 21    this Code (for service under Article 11). 22    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 23between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 24subject to this subsection who makes the required election 25shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 26subsection who fails for any reason to make the required   HB5246- 24 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 2deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 3    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 4participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 5prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 6either: 7        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 8    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 9    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 10    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 11    contributions for service annuities specified in 12    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or13        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 14    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 15    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 16    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 17    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 18    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 19    12-150. 20    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 21between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 22this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 23bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 24who fails for any reason to make the required election within 25the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 26made the election under item (ii).   HB5246- 25 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 2be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 3either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 4respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 5Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 6first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 7after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 8of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 9effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 10service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 11who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 12(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 13this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 14date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 15calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 16increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 17index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 18each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 19retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 20in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 21September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 22decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 23    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 24changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 25applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 26active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date   HB5246- 26 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1of Public Act 102-263). 2    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 3changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 4applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 5active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 6Public Act 100-23). 7    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 8otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 9participant who first became a member or participant on or 10after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 11retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 12date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 13participant who has not retired and who first became a member 14or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 15survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 16applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 1766 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 18child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 19amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 20survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 21January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 22annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 23retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 24occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 25the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 26one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not   HB5246- 27 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 2ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 3is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the 4annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 5index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 6each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 7annuity shall not be increased. 8    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 9person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 10protection service of a department, a conservation police 11officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an arson 12investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 13investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 14Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 15Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a 16security employee of the Department of Innovation and 17Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 18subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person who meets the 19requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 20calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 21the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 22has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 23eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 24regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 25the person is still in service. 26    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant   HB5246- 28 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 2on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 3or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 4member or participant under any other system or fund created 5by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 6those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 7this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 8person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 9system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 10termination of that employment, the person's retirement 11annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 12recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 13applicable Article of this Code.14    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 15system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 16January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 17retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 18contractual basis a position to provide services to a 19governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 20that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 21active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 22contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 23retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 24fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 25annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 26contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before   HB5246- 29 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 2such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 3required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 4contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 5retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 6be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 7    (i) (Blank). 8    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 9this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 10provisions of this Section shall control.11(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 12102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-813, eff. 135-13-22; 103-529, eff. 8-11-23.) 14    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-956)15    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 16    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 17on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 18participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 19fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 20system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 217, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 22of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 23self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 24participant of the retirement plan established under Section 2522-101; except that this Section applies to a person who   HB5246- 30 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 2writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 3under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 4to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 5a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 67-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 7system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 8deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 9to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 10subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 11Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 12intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 13date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 14Section 1-103.1 of this Code.15    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 16noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 17implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 18for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 19(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 20under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 21Article.22    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 23member under Article 16 on or after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly if that person 25(i) is at least 50 years of age, (ii) does not have any service 26credit under Article 16 or any reciprocal retirement system or   HB5246- 31 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1pension fund, and (iii) makes the election under subsection 2(b) of Section 16-204. 3    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 4member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 5implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 6for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 7(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 8under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 9Article.10    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 11subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 12under Section 1-161. 13    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 14member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 15months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 16Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 17of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 18Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 19which he or she is a member or participant. 20    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 21provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 22salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 23calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 24participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 25years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 26service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under   HB5246- 32 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 2(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 3person who first becomes a member or participant of any 4retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 5applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 6average salary" shall be substituted for the following:7        (1) (Blank).8        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 9    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 10    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 11    withdrawal". 12        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 13        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 14        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 15        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 16    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 17    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 18of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 19the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 20member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 21following for the purpose of determining the member's final 22average salary:23        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 24    paragraph of this subsection; or25        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 26    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the   HB5246- 33 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 2    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 3    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 4    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 5    of service in which the total salary or earnings 6    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 7    of months (or years) of service in that period.8    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 9this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 10benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 11salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 12participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 13$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 14increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 15previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 16percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 17price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 18preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.19    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 20means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 21the United States Department of Labor that measures the 22average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 23all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 241982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 25adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 26of the Department of Insurance and made available to the   HB5246- 34 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 21 of each year. 3    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 4under this Code (including, without limitation, the 5calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 6annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 7member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 8applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 9that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 10earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 11and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 12Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 13federal Social Security Act. 14    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 15wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 16limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 17Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 18of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 19amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 20reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 21services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 22any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 23annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 24    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 25result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 26contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause   HB5246- 35 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 2disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 3January 1, 2024. 4    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 5annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 667 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 7subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 8Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 9Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 10election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 11and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 12eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 13    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 14with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 15this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 16first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 17after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 18of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 19of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 20requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 21the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 22this Section. 23    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 24subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 25date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 26provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a   HB5246- 36 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 2application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 310 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 4requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 5whichever is applicable. 6    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 7is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 8service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 9member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 10member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 112022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 12(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 13credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 14that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 15service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 16member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 17member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 182022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 19(d-15) of this Section).20    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 21Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 22of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 23years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 24each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 25    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 26participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or   HB5246- 37 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 2date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 3either:4        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 5    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 6    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 7    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 8    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 9    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 10    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 11    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 12        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 13    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 14    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 15    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 16    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 17    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 18    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 19    this Code (for service under Article 11). 20    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 21between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 22subject to this subsection who makes the required election 23shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 24subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 25election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 26deemed to have made the election under item (ii).   HB5246- 38 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 2participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 3prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 4either: 5        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 6    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 7    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 8    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 9    contributions for service annuities specified in 10    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or11        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 12    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 13    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 14    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 15    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 16    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 17    12-150. 18    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 19between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 20this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 21bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 22who fails for any reason to make the required election within 23the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 24made the election under item (ii). 25    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 26be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring   HB5246- 39 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 2respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 3Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 4first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 5after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 6of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 7effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 8service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 9who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 10(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 11this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 12date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 13calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 14increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 15index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 16each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 17retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 18in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 19September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 20decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 21    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 22changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 23applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 24active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 25of Public Act 102-263). 26    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the   HB5246- 40 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 2applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 3active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 4Public Act 100-23). 5    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 6otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 7participant who first became a member or participant on or 8after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 9retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 10date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 11participant who has not retired and who first became a member 12or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 13survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 14applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 1566 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 16child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 17amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 18survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 19January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 20annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 21retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 22occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 23the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 24one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 25less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 26ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever   HB5246- 41 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the 2annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 3index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 4each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 5annuity shall not be increased. 6    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 7person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 8protection service of a department, a conservation police 9officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an 10investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, an arson 11investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 12investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 13Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 14Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a 15security employee of the Department of Innovation and 16Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 17subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person who meets the 18requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 19calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 20the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 21has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 22eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 23regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 24the person is still in service. 25    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 26of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section   HB5246- 42 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 2or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 3member or participant under any other system or fund created 4by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 5those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 6this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 7person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 8system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 9termination of that employment, the person's retirement 10annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 11recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 12applicable Article of this Code.13    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 14system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 15January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 16retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 17contractual basis a position to provide services to a 18governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 19that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 20active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 21contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 22retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 23fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 24annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 25contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 26accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit   HB5246- 43 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 2required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 3contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 4retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 5be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 6    (i) (Blank). 7    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 8this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 9provisions of this Section shall control.10(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-956, eff. 5-27-22; 103-529, eff. 128-11-23.) 13    (40 ILCS 5/16-203)14    Sec. 16-203. Application and expiration of new benefit 15increases.16    (a) As used in this Section, "new benefit increase" means 17an increase in the amount of any benefit provided under this 18Article, or an expansion of the conditions of eligibility for 19any benefit under this Article, that results from an amendment 20to this Code that takes effect after June 1, 2005 (the 21effective date of Public Act 94-4). "New benefit increase", 22however, does not include any benefit increase resulting from 23the changes made to Article 1 or this Article by Public Act 2495-910, Public Act 100-23, Public Act 100-587, Public Act 25100-743, Public Act 100-769, Public Act 101-10, Public Act   HB5246- 44 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1101-49, Public Act 102-16, or Public Act 102-871, or this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.3    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or 4any subsequent amendment to this Code, every new benefit 5increase is subject to this Section and shall be deemed to be 6granted only in conformance with and contingent upon 7compliance with the provisions of this Section. 8    (c) The Public Act enacting a new benefit increase must 9identify and provide for payment to the System of additional 10funding at least sufficient to fund the resulting annual 11increase in cost to the System as it accrues.12    Every new benefit increase is contingent upon the General 13Assembly providing the additional funding required under this 14subsection. The Commission on Government Forecasting and 15Accountability shall analyze whether adequate additional 16funding has been provided for the new benefit increase and 17shall report its analysis to the Public Pension Division of 18the Department of Insurance. A new benefit increase created by 19a Public Act that does not include the additional funding 20required under this subsection is null and void. If the Public 21Pension Division determines that the additional funding 22provided for a new benefit increase under this subsection is 23or has become inadequate, it may so certify to the Governor and 24the State Comptroller and, in the absence of corrective action 25by the General Assembly, the new benefit increase shall expire 26at the end of the fiscal year in which the certification is   HB5246- 45 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1made. 2    (d) Every new benefit increase shall expire 5 years after 3its effective date or on such earlier date as may be specified 4in the language enacting the new benefit increase or provided 5under subsection (c). This does not prevent the General 6Assembly from extending or re-creating a new benefit increase 7by law.8    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the language creating 9the new benefit increase, a new benefit increase that expires 10under this Section continues to apply to persons who applied 11and qualified for the affected benefit while the new benefit 12increase was in effect and to the affected beneficiaries and 13alternate payees of such persons, but does not apply to any 14other person, including, without limitation, a person who 15continues in service after the expiration date and did not 16apply and qualify for the affected benefit while the new 17benefit increase was in effect.18(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 19102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-871, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 206-30-23.) 21    (40 ILCS 5/16-204)22    Sec. 16-204. Optional defined contribution benefit.23    (a) As soon as practicable after the effective date of 24this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, the System 25shall offer a defined contribution benefit to active full-time   HB5246- 46 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1or part-time contractual members of the System who are 2employed by an employer eligible to participate in the defined 3contribution benefit under applicable law. The defined 4contribution benefit shall be an optional benefit to any 5full-time or part-time contractual member who chooses to 6participate. The defined contribution benefit shall collect 7optional employee and optional employer contributions into an 8account and shall offer investment options to the participant. 9    (b) In this subsection:10    "Defined benefit plan" means the retirement plan available 11under this Article for members who do not make the election 12under this subsection.13    "Eligible member" means a person who first becomes a 14member on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 15the 104th General Assembly who (i) is at least 50 years of age 16and (ii) does not have any service credit in this System or any 17other reciprocal retirement system or pension fund.18    An eligible member may elect to participate in the defined 19contribution benefit under this Section in lieu of 20participation in the defined benefit plan under this Article. 21The election to participate in the defined contribution 22benefit is irrevocable and must be made in writing in the 23manner prescribed by the System. Participation in the defined 24contribution plan shall begin as soon as practical after the 25member makes the election under this subsection.26    A member participating under this subsection may not   HB5246- 47 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1establish service credit under this Article and is not 2eligible for any other benefit under this Article. If that 3member terminates service and thereafter returns to service 4under this Article, that member may not participate in the 5defined benefit plan and shall continue participating under 6this subsection.7    The member shall contribute an amount equal to 7.5% of the 8member's pre-tax salary to the member's defined contribution 9account. In addition, the employer shall contribute 6% of the 10member's pre-tax salary to the member's defined contribution 11account. 12    (c) The benefit under this Section shall be operated in 13full compliance with any applicable State and federal laws, 14and the System shall utilize generally accepted practices in 15creating and maintaining the benefit for the best interest of 16the participants. 17    (d) In administering the defined contribution benefit, the 18System shall require that the defined contribution benefit 19recordkeeper agree that, in performing services with respect 20to the defined contribution benefit, the recordkeeper: (i) 21will not use information received as a result of providing 22services with respect to the defined contribution benefit or 23the participants in the defined contribution benefit to 24solicit the participants in the defined contribution benefit 25for the purpose of cross-selling nonplan products and 26services, unless in response to a request by a participant in   HB5246- 48 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1the defined contribution benefit; and (ii) will not promote, 2recommend, endorse, or solicit participants in the defined 3contribution benefit to purchase any financial products or 4services outside of the defined contribution benefit, except 5that links to parts of the recordkeeper's website that are 6generally available to the public, are about commercial 7products, and may be encountered by a participant in the 8regular course of navigating the recordkeeper's website will 9not constitute a violation of this item (ii). 10    (e) The System may use funds from the employee and 11employer contributions to defray any and all costs of creating 12and maintaining the benefit. In addition, the System may use 13funds provided under Section 16-158 of this Code to defray any 14and all costs of creating and maintaining the benefit and then 15shall reimburse those costs from funds received from the 16employee and employer contributions under this Section. All 17employers must comply with the reporting and administrative 18functions established by the System and are required to 19implement the benefits established under this Section. The 20System shall produce an annual report on the participation in 21the benefit and shall make the report public.22    (f) As soon as is practicable on or after January 1, 2022, 23the System shall automatically enroll any employee who first 24becomes an active full-time or part-time contractual member in 25the System. A member automatically enrolled under this Section 26shall have 3% of his or her pre-tax compensation deferred into   HB5246- 49 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1his or her deferred compensation account. A member may elect, 2in a manner provided for by the System, to not participate in 3the defined contribution benefit or to increase or reduce the 4amount of pre-tax compensation contributed, consistent with 5State or federal law. A member shall be automatically enrolled 6in the benefit beginning the first day of the pay period 7following the close of the notice period, or as soon as 8practicable, unless the employee elects otherwise within the 9notice period. For the purposes of this Section, "notice 10period" means a reasonable period of time after the employee 11is provided with an automatic enrollment notice as required 12under Section 414(w) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 13amended. An active full-time or part-time contractual member 14who has been automatically enrolled in the benefit may elect, 15within 90 days following the member's initial contribution, to 16withdraw the contribution and receive a refund of amounts 17deferred, as adjusted for applicable earnings and fees. A 18member making such an election shall forfeit all employer 19matching contributions, if any, made with respect to the 20initial contribution and the forfeited amounts shall be used 21to defray plan expenses. Any refunded amount shall be included 22in the member's gross income for the taxable year in which the 23refund is issued.24    This subsection does not apply to a member who makes the 25election under subsection (b). 26    (g) On or after January 1, 2023, the System may elect to   HB5246- 50 -LRB104 16458 RPS 29851 b1increase the automatic annual contributions under this 2Section. The increase in the rate of contribution, however, 3shall not exceed 2% of a member's pre-tax compensation per 4year, and at no time shall any total contribution exceed any 5contribution limits established by State or federal law.6    This subsection does not apply to a member who makes the 7election under subsection (b). 8    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 9active members eligible to participate in the defined 10contribution benefit do not include employees of a department 11as defined in Section 14-103.04. 12(Source: P.A. 103-552, eff. 8-11-23; 104-284, eff. 1-1-26.) 13    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 14Section 8.50 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)16    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 178 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 18the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 19Act of the 104th General Assembly. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.